test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-jarplan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - jarplan e-stem lentokone: # Noun - full paradigm
     jarplan+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: jarplan
     jarplan+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: jarplaan
     jarplan+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: jarplaan
     jarplan+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: jarplaaʹne
     jarplan+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: jarplaanâst
     jarplan+N+Sg+Com+Indef: jarplaanin
     jarplan+N+Ess+Indef: jarplaanen
     jarplan+N+Par+Indef: jarplaaned
     jarplan+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [jarplaantaa, jarplaantää]
     jarplan+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: jarplaan
     jarplan+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: jarplaani
     jarplan+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: jarplaanid
     jarplan+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: jarplaanid
     jarplan+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: jarplaanin
     jarplan+N+Pl+Com+Indef: jarplaanivuiʹm
     jarplan+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [jarplaanitaa, jarplaanitää]
